test/src/morphology/V-tangosj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - таӈо(сь): # Verb 'to pass' /Type 11/ - partial paradigm
     таӈось+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: таӈудмʼ
     таӈось+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: таӈун
     таӈось+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: таӈу
     таӈось+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: таӈуниʼ
     таӈось+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: таӈудиʼ
     таӈось+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: таӈухуʼ
     таӈось+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: таӈуваˮ
     таӈось+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: таӈудаˮ
     таӈось+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: таӈуˮ
     таӈось+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: таӈудамзь
     таӈось+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: таӈунась
     таӈось+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: таӈусь
     таӈось+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: таӈунинзь
     таӈось+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: таӈудинзь
     таӈось+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: таӈухунзь
     таӈось+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: таӈуваць
     таӈось+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: таӈудаць
     таӈось+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: таӈуць
     
     таӈось+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1: таӈоидмʼ
     таӈось+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2: таӈоин
     таӈось+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3: таӈои
     таӈось+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1: таӈоиниʼ
     таӈось+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2: таӈоидиʼ
     таӈось+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3: таӈоихиʼ
     таӈось+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1: таӈоиваˮ
     таӈось+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2: таӈоидаˮ
     таӈось+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3: таӈоиˮ
     таӈось+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1: таӈоидамзь
     таӈось+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2: таӈоинась
     таӈось+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3: таӈоись
     таӈось+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1: таӈоининзь
     таӈось+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2: таӈоидинзь
     таӈось+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3: таӈоихинзь
     таӈось+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1: таӈоиваць
     таӈось+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2: таӈоидаць
     таӈось+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3: таӈоиць
     таӈось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg1: таӈовэдмʼ
     таӈось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg2: таӈовэн
     таӈось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg3: таӈовы
     таӈось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu1: таӈовэниʼ
     таӈось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu2: таӈовэдиʼ
     таӈось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu3: таӈовэхэʼ
     таӈось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl1: таӈовэваˮ
     таӈось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl2: таӈовэдаˮ
     таӈось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl3: таӈовыˮ
     таӈось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg1: таӈовэдамзь
     таӈось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg2: таӈовэнась
     таӈось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg3: [таӈовысь, таӈовэсь]
     таӈось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu1: таӈовэнинзь
     таӈось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu2: таӈовэдинзь
     таӈось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu3: таӈовэхэнзь
     таӈось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl1: таӈовэваць
     таӈось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl2: таӈовэдаць
     таӈось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl3: [таӈовыць, таӈовэць]
     таӈось+V+IV+InfImprf: таӈова
     таӈось+V+IV+InfPrf: таӈоˮма
     таӈось+V+IV+PrcImprf: таӈода
     таӈось+V+IV+PrcPrf: таӈовы
     таӈось+V+IV+PrcFut: [таӈованда, таӈовнда]
     таӈось+V+IV+PrcNeg: таӈовдавэй
     таӈось+V+IV+Ger: [таӈо, таӈось]
     таӈось+V+IV+GerFin: таӈованзь
     таӈось+V+IV+ConNeg: таӈуˮ
     таӈось+V+IV+Subord+Abs: таӈобˮ
     таӈось+V+IV+Evas+Abs: таӈовоӈгад
     таӈось+V+IV+Fut+ConNeg: таӈодˮ
     таӈось+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: таӈодадмʼ
     таӈось+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: таӈодан
     таӈось+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: таӈода
     таӈось+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: таӈоданиʼ
     таӈось+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: таӈодадиʼ
     таӈось+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: таӈодаӈахаʼ
     таӈось+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: таӈодаваˮ
     таӈось+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: таӈодадаˮ
     таӈось+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: таӈодаˮ 
